Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-720.01
Unfounded reports; how treated.

All reports of child abuse or neglect which are not under subdivision (1)(a), (b), or (c) of section 28-720 shall be considered unfounded and shall be maintained only in the tracking system of child protection cases pursuant to section 28-715 and not in the central registry of child protection cases maintained pursuant to section 28-718.

Laws 2005, LB 116, § 12;

Laws 2014, LB853, § 10;

Laws 2015, LB292, § 3.